Utah statutes.
78B-14-201 (Superseded 07/01/15).   Bases for jurisdiction over nonresident.

(1)  In a proceeding to establish or enforce a support order or to determine parentage, a tribunal of this state may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual, or the individual's guardian or conservator, if:

(a)  the individual is personally served with notice within this state;

(b)  the individual submits to the jurisdiction of this state by consent, by entering a general appearance, or by filing a responsive document having the effect of waiving any contest to personal jurisdiction;

(c)  the individual resided with the child in this state;

(d)  the individual resided in this state and provided prenatal expenses or support for the child;

(e)  the child resides in this state as a result of the acts or directives of the individual;

(f)  the individual engaged in sexual intercourse in this state and the child may have been conceived by that act of intercourse;

(g)  the individual asserted parentage in the putative father registry maintained in this state by the state registrar of vital records in the Department of Health pursuant to Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 1, Utah Adoption Act; or

(h)  there is any other basis consistent with the constitutions of this state and the United States for the exercise of personal jurisdiction.

(2)  The bases of personal jurisdiction set forth in Subsection (1) or in any other law of this state may not be used to acquire personal jurisdiction for a tribunal of the state to modify a child-support order of another state unless the requirements of Section 78B-14-611 or 78B-14-615 are met.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

